District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.54

Incumbents.

A person holding an appointment to a position in the Executive Service on October 21, 1998 shall continue to be paid at his or her existing rate of pay until the Mayor effects a personnel action establishing a new salary within the designated range for the level of the position to which the person is appointed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1054
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(m), 45 DCR 2464
Applicability of § 101(m) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-610.51.
1981 Ed., § 1-611.54.